District of Columbia statutes.
1-615.55

Disciplinary actions; fine.

(a)

As part of the relief ordered in an administrative, arbitration or judicial proceeding, any person who is found to have violated § 1-615.53 or § 2-223.02 shall be subject to appropriate disciplinary action including dismissal.

(b)

As part of the relief ordered in a judicial proceeding, any person who is found to have violated § 1-615.53 or § 2-223.02 shall be subject to a civil fine not to exceed $10,000.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1555
as added Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 102(c), 45 DCR 5147
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-117, § 2(d), 57 DCR 896
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 1-616.51.
D.C. Law 18-117 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “(a) As part of the relief ordered in an administrative, arbitration or judicial proceeding, any supervisor, including any manager, department director, or other District official, who is found to have violated § 1-615.53 shall be subject to appropriate disciplinary action including dismissal. (b) As part of the relief ordered in a proceeding, any supervisor who is found to have violated § 1-615.53 shall be subject to a civil fine not to exceed $1000.”
1981 Ed., § 1-616.15.